Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB27.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 381.800 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The governing documents of an association shall not prohibit the outdoor display of political yard signs by an
owner or resident on the owner's or resident's property. Signs shall be displayed no earlier than thirty (30) days
before any special, primary, or regular election and no later than seven (7) days after that election unless a
longer time period is provided by local ordinance. The governing documents may include reasonable rules and
regulations regarding the placement, size, and manner of display of political yard signs.
(2) All planned communities in this Commonwealth shall be subject to the provisions of subsection (1) of this
section, and any provision of any existing governing document of a planned community in contravention of
subsection (1) is void.
Signed by Governor March 18, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version